Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 18.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska1-136.01
Permit; renewal; professional development;
rules and regulations.

(1) As a condition for renewal of
a permit issued under subdivision (1)(a) of section 1-136, the board, pursuant to rules
and regulations adopted and promulgated by the board, may require permitholders
to furnish evidence of participation in professional development in accounting,
auditing, or related areas for fifteen days within the preceding three calendar
years or, in order to facilitate the issuance of biennial permits as provided
in subdivision (2)(b) of section 1-136, for ten days within the preceding
two calendar years. The board may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
regarding such professional development.

(2) In determining compliance with the professional development requirement,
the board may include credits earned during the current calendar year in addition
to those earned in the preceding calendar years in which professional development
is required under subsection (1) of this section. If such credits are included
they shall not count toward the next succeeding permit renewal requirement.

Laws 1971, LB 858, § 3;

Laws 1979, LB 278, § 6;

Laws 1984, LB 473, § 18;

Laws 1997, LB 114, § 28;

Laws 2009, LB31, § 18.